California, session 20252026, SB654.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 71422 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:71422. (a) (1) The agency shall oversee the development administration of a registry for greenhouse gas emissions that result from the water-energy nexus using the best-available data.(2) Participation in the registry shall be voluntary and open to any entity conducting business in the state. A participating entity may register its emissions, including emissions generated outside of the state, on an entitywide basis and may utilize the services of the registry.(b) The agency may enter into a contract with a qualified nonprofit organization to do all of the following:(1)Develop, in consultation with the agency and other relevant state agencies, the registry through a public stakeholder process, as determined by the agency. In developing the registry, the chosen qualified nonprofit organization shall consider greenhouse gas emissions accounting methodologies developed as part of programs authorized pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).(2)(1) Help participating entities in the state to establish emissions baselines.(3)(2) Encourage voluntary actions to increase water and energy efficiency measures to reduce the greenhouse gas intensity of the state’s water system.(4)(3) Enable participating entities to record voluntary entitywide greenhouse gas emissions reductions in a consistent format that is supported by third-party verification.(5)(4) Recognize, publicize, and promote participating entities making voluntary reductions of greenhouse gas emissions.(6)(5) Recruit broad participation in the registry from all economic sectors and regions of the state. state to meet the different needs of water users throughout the state by various means, including, but not limited to, workshops, trainings, and other similar activities, technical support for reporting of emissions, and climate action planning to assist with reduction strategies and improve water and energy efficiency.(7)Facilitate streamlined data reporting for relevant entities already reporting to the Climate Registry as part of its voluntary corporate greenhouse gas emissions reporting program.(c) (1)The contract authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) (b), as it read on January 1, 2025, shall be limited to a term of three years. The contract authorized pursuant to subdivision (b), as amended pursuant to the bill adding this sentence, shall be limited to a term of three years and a total budget of two million dollars ($2,000,000).(2)Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the term of the contract may be extended for one year upon the agreement of both parties to the contract.